Hawaii statutes.
§248-1 Definitions. Wherever used in
this chapter:

"Council" means the county council of
each county concerned.

"Director" means the state director
of finance unless otherwise stated or indicated in context.

"Liquid fuel" or "fuel" has
the meaning defined by section 243-1.

"Property" or "real
property" means and includes all land and appurtenances thereof and the
buildings, structures, fences, and improvements erected on or affixed to the
same, and any fixture that is erected on or affixed to such land, buildings,
structures, fences, and improvements, including all machinery and other
mechanical or other allied equipment and the foundations thereof, whose use
thereof is necessary to the utility of such land, buildings, structures,
fences, and improvements, or whose removal therefrom cannot be accomplished
without substantial damage to such land, buildings, structures, fences, and
improvements, excluding, however, any growing crops. [RL 1935, pts of §§1900,
2010, and 2100; am L 1935, c 153, §§1, 3; am L 1937, c 172, §4; am L Sp 1941, c
26, pt of §1; RL 1945, §5251; am L 1947, c 111, §4; RL 1955, §129-1; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; HRS §248-1; am L 2016, c 52, §4]

Revision Note

Definitions
rearranged.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next